District of Columbia statutes.
34-1263.01

Compliance.

(a)

A cable operator shall not be excused from complying with any of the terms and conditions of this chapter or the franchise agreement, as a result of any failure of the District, upon any one or more occasions, to insist upon the cable operator’s performance or to seek the cable operator’s compliance with any one or more of such terms or conditions.

(b)

A pending litigation or an appeal to a regulatory body or court of competent jurisdiction shall not excuse a cable operator from the performance of its obligations under this chapter or the franchise agreement unless a stay is obtained or the cable operator is otherwise excused from performance by operation of law. Failure of the cable operator to perform such obligations because of pending litigation or appeal, in the absence of a stay issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, may result in forfeiture or revocation pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or the franchise agreement.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 1301
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334